District of Columbia statutes.
7-838

Assumption of costs by District government.

If a newborn’s parents are indigent, the government of the District of Columbia shall pay all costs related to screening under this subchapter. If a newborn’s parents are indigent and the child’s residence is in the District of Columbia, the government of the District of Columbia shall pay any subsequent costs for follow-up testing and treatment. The Mayor shall define “indigency” under this section and may establish a sliding scale of partial payment by the District of Columbia government based on the parents’ reasonable ability to pay some of the costs.

Apr. 29, 1980, D.C. Law 3-65, § 9, 27 DCR 1087
July 25, 1985, D.C. Law 6-13, § 2(d), 32 DCR 3235

History

1981 Ed., § 6-318.

Prior Codifications

Delegation of authority pursuant to Law 6-13, see Mayor’s Order 86-36, March 3, 1986.

Delegation of Authority